District of Columbia statutes.
1-626.06

Contracting authority.

The Mayor may select 1 or more contractors to provide services as may be part of the defined contribution plan under § 1-626.05(3). Any contract under § 1-626.05(2) and (3) shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2606
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(g), 34 DCR 5079

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-627.6.

Mayor's Orders

Establishment of Pension Benefit Committee: See Mayor’s Order 89-235, October 5, 1989.